North Carolina statutes. Chapter 45. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust.
ARTICLE 3.
Mortgage Sales.

§ 45-22: Transferred to G.S. 45-21.39 by Session Laws 1949, c. 720, s. 4.

§ 45-26.1: Transferred to G.S. 45-21.40 by Session Laws 1949, c. 720, s. 4.

§ 45-31: Transferred to G.S. 45-21.41 by Session Laws 1949, c. 720, s. 4.

§ 45-36.1: Transferred to G.S. 45-21.42 by Session Laws 1949, c. 720, s. 4.

§§ 45-23 through 45-26: Repealed by Session Laws 1949, c. 720, s. 5.

§§ 45-27 through 45-30: Repealed by Session Laws 1949, c. 720, s. 5.

§ 45-32: Transferred to G.S. 45-21.34 to 45-21.38 by Session Laws 1949, c. 720, s. 3.